Hawaii statutes.
[§184-4.5] Smoking or use of tobacco
products prohibited. (a) Within the state park system, it shall be
unlawful for any person to engage in:

(1) Smoking; or

(2) The use of tobacco products;

provided that the department may designate exclusive
use areas that shall not be subject to this section.

(b) Clearly legible signs shall be
conspicuously posted at each park; provided that any signs posted by the
department pursuant to this section shall use letters of not less than one inch
in height.

(c) For purposes of this section:

"Cigar" means any roll for smoking
made wholly or in part of tobacco if the product is wrapped in any substance
containing tobacco.

"Cigarette" means any roll for
smoking that:

(1) Is made wholly or in part of tobacco, irrespective
of size or shape or whether the tobacco is flavored, adulterated, or mixed with
any other ingredient; and

(2) Has a wrapper or cover that is made of paper or
any other substance or material other than tobacco.

"Electronic smoking device" means any
electronic product that can be used to simulate smoking in the delivery of
nicotine or other substances to the person inhaling from the device, including
but not limited to an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic
cigarillo, or electronic pipe, and any cartridge or other component of the
device or related product.

"Smoking" means inhaling or exhaling
upon, burning, or carrying any lit cigarette, cigar, or pipe or the use of an
electronic smoking device.

"Tobacco products" means tobacco in
any form, other than cigarettes, that is prepared or intended for consumption
or for personal use by humans, including cigars and any substitutes thereof
other than cigarettes that bear the semblance thereof, snuff, chewing or
smokeless tobacco, and smoking or pipe tobacco. [L 2015, c 123, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next